Hawaii statutes.
§246-58 Same; notice, form of. The
notice of sale shall contain the names of the persons assessed, the names of
the present owners (so far as shown by the records of the tax office and the
records, if any, in the office of the assistant registrar of the land court),
the character and amount of the tax, and the tax year or years, with interest,
penalties, costs, expenses, and charges accrued or to accrue to the date
appointed for the sale, a brief description of the property to be sold, and the
time and place of sale, and shall warn the persons assessed, and all persons
having or claiming to have any mortgage or other lien thereon or any legal or
equitable right, title, or other interest in the property, that unless the tax,
with all interest, penalties, costs, expenses, and charges accrued to the date
of payment, is paid before the time of sale appointed, the property advertised
for sale will be sold as advertised. The tax collector may include in one
advertisement of notice of sale notice of foreclosure upon more than one parcel
of real property, whether or not owned by the same person and whether or not
the liens are for the same tax year or years. [L 1932 2d, c 40, pt of §66; RL
1935, pt of §1961; am L 1939, c 221, pt of §7; am L 1941, c 255, pt of §1; RL
1945, pt of §5168; RL 1955, §128-41; HRS §246-58]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next